North Carolina, session 2025, HB1009.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. EXTRATERRITORIAL PLANNING JURISDICTION PROHIBITED
SECTION 1. G.S. 160D-201 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-201. Planning and development regulation jurisdiction.
(a) Cities. – All of the powers granted by this Chapter may be exercised by any city within
its corporate limits and within any extraterritorial area established pursuant to G.S. 160D-202.
limits.
… ."
SECTION 2. G.S. 160D-202 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-202. Municipal County authority within city limits; transfer and relinquishment
of extraterritorial jurisdiction.
(a) Geographic Scope. – Any city may exercise the powers granted to cities under this
Chapter within a defined area extending not more than one mile beyond its contiguous corporate
limits. In addition, a city of 10,000 or more population but less than 25,000 may exercise these
powers over an area extending not more than two miles beyond its limits and a city of 25,000 or
more population may exercise these powers over an area extending not more than three miles
beyond its limits. In determining the population of a city for the purposes of this Chapter, the city
council and the board of county commissioners may use the most recent annual estimate of
population as certified by the Secretary of the North Carolina Department of Administration.
Pursuant to G.S. 160A-58.4, extraterritorial municipal planning and development regulation may
be extended only from the primary corporate boundary of a city and not from the boundary of
satellite areas of the city.
(b) Authority in the Extraterritorial Area. – A city may not exercise any power conferred
by this Chapter in its extraterritorial jurisdiction that it is not exercising within its corporate limits.
A city may exercise in its extraterritorial area all powers conferred by this Chapter that it is
exercising within its corporate limits. If a city fails to extend a particular type of development
regulation to the extraterritorial area, the county may elect to exercise that particular type of
regulation in the extraterritorial area.
(c) County Approval of City Jurisdiction. – Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this
section, no city may extend its extraterritorial powers into any area for which the county has
*H1009-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
adopted and is enforcing county zoning and subdivision regulations. However, the city may do
so where the county is not exercising both of these powers, or when the city and the county have
agreed upon the area within which each will exercise the powers conferred by this Chapter. No
city may extend its extraterritorial powers beyond one mile from its corporate limits without the
approval of the board or boards of county commissioners with jurisdiction over the area.
(d) Notice of Proposed Jurisdiction Change. – Any municipality proposing to exercise
extraterritorial jurisdiction under this Chapter shall notify the owners of all parcels of land
proposed for addition to the area of extraterritorial jurisdiction, as shown on the county tax
records. The notice shall be sent by first-class mail to the last addresses listed for affected
property owners in the county tax records. The notice shall inform the landowner of the effect of
the extension of extraterritorial jurisdiction, of the landowner's right to participate in a legislative
hearing prior to adoption of any ordinance extending the area of extraterritorial jurisdiction, as
provided in G.S. 160D-601, and of the right of all residents of the area to apply to the board of
county commissioners to serve as a representative on the planning board and the board of
adjustment, as provided in G.S. 160D-303. The notice shall be mailed at least 30 days prior to
the date of the hearing. The person or persons mailing the notices shall certify to the city council
that the notices were sent by first-class mail, and the certificate shall be deemed conclusive in the
absence of fraud.
(e) Boundaries. – Any council exercising extraterritorial jurisdiction under this Chapter
shall adopt an ordinance specifying the areas to be included based upon existing or projected
urban development and areas of critical concern to the city, as evidenced by officially adopted
plans for its development. A single jurisdictional boundary shall be applicable for all powers
conferred in this Chapter. Boundaries shall be defined, to the extent feasible, in terms of
geographical features identifiable on the ground. Boundaries may follow parcel ownership
boundaries. A council may, in its discretion, exclude from its extraterritorial jurisdiction areas
lying in another county, areas separated from the city by barriers to urban growth, or areas whose
projected development will have minimal impact on the city. The boundaries specified in the
ordinance shall at all times be drawn on a map, set forth in a written description, or shown by a
combination of these techniques. This delineation shall be maintained in the manner provided in
G.S. 160A-22 for the delineation of the corporate limits and shall be recorded in the office of the
register of deeds of each county in which any portion of the area lies.
Where the extraterritorial jurisdiction of two or more cities overlaps, the jurisdictional
boundary between them shall be a line connecting the midway points of the overlapping area
unless the city councils agree to another boundary line within the overlapping area based upon
existing or projected patterns of development.
(f)(a) County Authority Within City Jurisdiction. – The county may, on request of the city
council, exercise any or all of these the powers granted in this Chapter in any or all areas lying
within the city's corporate limits or within the city's specified area of extraterritorial jurisdiction.
limits.
(g) (b) Transfer of Jurisdiction. – When a city annexes,annexes an area or a new city is
incorporated in, or a city extends its jurisdiction to include, in an area that is currently being
regulated by the county, the county development regulations and powers of enforcement shall
remain in effect until (i) the city has adopted such development regulations or (ii) a period of 60
days has elapsed following the annexation, extension, annexation or incorporation, whichever is
sooner. Prior to the transfer of jurisdiction, the city may hold hearings and take any other
measures consistent with G.S. 160D-204 that may be required in order to adopt and apply its
development regulations for the area at the same time it assumes jurisdiction.
(h) (c) Relinquishment of Jurisdiction. – When a city relinquishes jurisdiction over an area
that it is regulating under this Chapter to a county, the city development regulations and powers
of enforcement shall remain in effect until (i) the county has adopted such development
regulation or (ii) a period of 60 days has elapsed following the action by which the city
Page 2 House Bill 1009-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
relinquished jurisdiction, whichever is sooner. Prior to the transfer of jurisdiction, the county
may hold hearings and take other measures consistent with G.S. 160D-204 that may be required
in order to adopt and apply its development regulations for the area at the same time it assumes
jurisdiction.
(i) (d) Process for Local Government Approval. – When a local government is granted
powers by this section subject to the request, approval, or agreement of another local government,
the request, approval, or agreement shall be evidenced by a formally adopted resolution of the
governing board of the local government. Any such request, approval, or agreement can be
rescinded upon two years' written notice to the other governing boards concerned by repealing
the resolution. The resolution may be modified at any time by mutual agreement of the governing
boards concerned.
(j) Local Acts. – Nothing in this section shall repeal, modify, or amend any local act that
defines the boundaries of a city's extraterritorial jurisdiction by metes and bounds or courses and
distances.
(k) (e) Effect on Vested Rights. – Whenever a city or county, pursuant to this section,
acquires jurisdiction over a territory that theretofore has been subject to the jurisdiction of another
local government, any person who has acquired vested rights in the surrendering jurisdiction may
exercise those rights as if no change of jurisdiction had occurred. The city or county acquiring
jurisdiction may take any action regarding such a development approval, certificate, or other
evidence of compliance that could have been taken by the local government surrendering
jurisdiction pursuant to its development regulations. Except as provided in this subsection, any
building, structure, or other land use in a territory over which a city or county has acquired
jurisdiction is subject to the development regulations of the city or county."
SECTION 3. G.S. 160D-307 is repealed.
SECTION 4. G.S. 160D-602 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-602. Notice of hearing on proposed zoning map amendments.
(a) Mailed Notice. – Subject to the limitations of this Chapter, an ordinance shall provide
for the manner in which zoning regulations and the boundaries of zoning districts are to be
determined, established, and enforced, and from time to time amended, supplemented, or
changed, in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. The owners of affected parcels of
land and the owners of all parcels of land abutting that parcel of land shall be mailed a notice of
the hearing on a proposed zoning map amendment by first-class mail at the last addresses listed
for such owners on the county tax abstracts. For the purpose of this section, properties are
"abutting" even if separated by a street, railroad, or other transportation corridor. This notice must
be deposited in the mail at least 10 but not more than 25 days prior to the date of the hearing. If
the zoning map amendment is being proposed in conjunction with an expansion of municipal
extraterritorial planning and development regulation jurisdiction under G.S. 160D-202, a single
hearing on the zoning map amendment and the boundary amendment may be held. In this
instance, the initial notice of the zoning map amendment hearing may be combined with the
boundary hearing notice and the combined hearing notice mailed at least 30 days prior to the
hearing.
… ."
SECTION 5. G.S. 160D-903 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-903. Agricultural uses.
…
(c) Agricultural Areas in Municipal Extraterritorial Jurisdiction. – Property that is located
in a city's extraterritorial planning and development regulation jurisdiction and that is used for
bona fide farm purposes is exempt from the city's zoning regulation to the same extent bona fide
farming activities are exempt from county zoning pursuant to this section. As used in this
subsection, "property" means a single tract of property or an identifiable portion of a single tract.
Property that ceases to be used for bona fide farm purposes becomes subject to exercise of the
House Bill 1009-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
city's extraterritorial planning and development regulation jurisdiction under this Chapter. For
purposes of complying with State or federal law, property that is exempt from municipal zoning
pursuant to this subsection is subject to the county's floodplain regulation or all floodplain
regulation provisions of the county's unified development ordinance.
… ."
SECTION 6. G.S. 160D-912 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-912. Outdoor advertising.
…
(m) This section does not apply to any ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004. A local
government may amend an ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004, to extend application of the
ordinance to off-premises outdoor advertising located in territory acquired by annexation or
located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the city. annexation. A local government may repeal
or amend an ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004, so long as the amendment to the existing
ordinance does not reduce the period of amortization in effect on June 19, 2020.
… ."
SECTION 7. G.S. 160D-925 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-925. Stormwater control.
…
(e) Unless the local government requests the permit condition in its permit application,
the Environmental Management Commission may not require as a condition of an NPDES
stormwater permit issued pursuant to G.S. 143-214.7 that a city implement the measure required
by 40 Code of Federal Regulations § 122.34(b)(3)(1 July 2003 Edition) in its extraterritorial
jurisdiction.
… ."
SECTION 8. G.S. 160D-1125 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160D-1125. Enforcement.
…
(c) Additional Lien. – The amounts incurred by a local government in connection with
the removal or demolition are also a lien against any other real property owned by the owner of
the building or structure and located within the local government's planning and development
regulation jurisdiction, and for cities without extraterritorial planning and development
jurisdiction, within one mile of the city limits, jurisdiction, except for the owner's primary
residence. The provisions of subsection (b) of this section apply to this additional lien, except
that this additional lien is inferior to all prior liens and shall be collected as a money judgment.
… ."
SECTION 9. Any provision in a local act, including a local act establishing or
amending a city charter, that grants a city the power to exercise extraterritorial planning
jurisdiction under Article 19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter
160D of the General Statutes, is hereby repealed.
SECTION 10. The relinquishment of jurisdiction over an area that a city is regulating
under the authority of extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article 19 of Chapter 160A of
the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, shall become
effective January 1, 2026. However, nothing in this act shall be construed as prohibiting a city
from relinquishing jurisdiction over an area prior to January 1, 2026 in accordance with
G.S. 160D-202.
SECTION 11. Upon relinquishment of jurisdiction over an area that a city is
regulating under the authority of extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article 19 of Chapter
160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D of the General Statutes:
(1) The city regulations and powers of enforcement shall remain in effect until (i)
the county has adopted the regulation or (ii) a period of 60 days has elapsed
following the effective date of this act, whichever is sooner. During this
Page 4 House Bill 1009-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
period, the county may hold hearings and take other measures that may be
required in order to adopt its regulations for the area.
(2) Any person who has acquired vested rights under a permit, certificate, or other
evidence of compliance issued by the city may exercise those rights as if no
change of jurisdiction had occurred. The county acquiring jurisdiction may
take any action regarding the permit, certificate, or other evidence of
compliance that could have been taken by the city surrendering jurisdiction
pursuant to its ordinances and regulations. Except as provided in this section,
any building, structure, or other land use in a territory over which a county has
acquired jurisdiction is subject to the ordinances and regulations of the county.

PART II. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 12. G.S. 113A-208 reads as rewritten:
"§ 113A-208. Regulation of mountain ridge construction by counties and cities.
…
(d) An ordinance adopted under the authority of this section applies to all protected
mountain ridges as defined in G.S. 113A-206. A county or city may apply the ordinance to other
mountain ridges within its jurisdiction if it finds that this application is reasonably necessary to
protect against some or all of the hazards or problems set forth in G.S. 113A-207. Additionally,
a city with a population of 50,000 or more may apply the ordinance to other mountain ridges
within its extraterritorial planning jurisdiction if it finds that this application is reasonably
necessary to protect against some or all of the hazards or problems set forth in G.S. 113A-207.
… ."
SECTION 13. G.S. 122C-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(13e) Extraterritorial jurisdiction. – The boundaries of the area over which the Town
of Butner was exercising extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article
19 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D of
the General Statutes, prior to the Town's relinquishment of jurisdiction over
the area on or before January 1, 2026.
…."
SECTION 14. G.S. 122C-403 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-403. Secretary's authority over Camp Butner reservation.
The Secretary shall administer the Camp Butner reservation except (i) those areas within the
municipal boundaries of the Town of Butner and (ii) that portion of the Town of Butner's
extraterritorial jurisdiction jurisdiction, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(13e), consisting of lands not
owned by the State of North Carolina. In performing this duty, the Secretary has the powers listed
below. In exercising these powers the Secretary has the same authority and is subject to the same
restrictions that the governing body of a city would have and would be subject to if the reservation
was a city, unless this section provides to the contrary. The Secretary may do the following:
… ."
SECTION 15. G.S. 122C-405 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-405. Procedure applicable to rules.
Rules adopted by the Secretary under this Article shall be adopted in accordance with the
procedures for adopting a city ordinance on the same subject, shall be subject to review in the
manner provided for a city ordinance adopted on the same subject, and shall be enforceable in
accordance with the procedures for enforcing a city ordinance on the same subject. Violation of
a rule adopted under this Article is punishable as provided in G.S. 122C-406.
House Bill 1009-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Rules adopted under this Article may apply to part or all of the Camp Butner Reservation,
except those areas within the municipal boundaries of the Town of Butner and that portion of the
Town of Butner's extraterritorial jurisdiction jurisdiction, as defined in G.S. 122C-3(13e),
consisting of lands not owned by the State of North Carolina. If a public hearing is required
before the adoption of a rule, Advisory the Secretary shall designate one or more employees of
the Department to conduct the hearing. The Butner Town Council shall receive at least 14 days'
advance written notice of any public hearing with all correspondence concerning such public
hearings to be directed to the mayor of the Town of Butner and sent by certified mail, return
receipt requested, or equivalent delivery service to Butner Town Hall."
SECTION 16. G.S. 122C-410 reads as rewritten:
"§ 122C-410. Authority of county or city over Camp Butner Reservation; zoning
jurisdiction by Town of Butner over State lands.
(a) A municipality other than the Town of Butner may not annex territory extending into
or extend its extraterritorial jurisdiction into the Camp Butner reservation without written
approval from the Secretary and the Butner Town Council of each proposed annexation or
extension. annexation. The Town of Butner may not annex territory extending into or extend its
extraterritorial jurisdiction into those portions of the Camp Butner Reservation owned by the
State of North Carolina without written approval from the Secretary of each proposed annexation
or extension. annexation. The procedures, if any, for withdrawing approval granted by the
Secretary to an annexation or extension of extraterritorial jurisdiction shall be stated in the notice
of approval.
(b) A county ordinance may apply in part or all of the Camp Butner reservation (other
than areas within the Town of Butner) if the Secretary gives written approval of the ordinance,
except that ordinances adopted by a county under Chapter 160D of the General Statutes may not
apply in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the Town of Butner without approval of the Butner
Town Council. ordinance. The Secretary may withdraw approval of a county ordinance by giving
written notification, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the county. A county ordinance
ceases to be effective in the Camp Butner reservation 30 days after the county receives the written
notice of the withdrawal of approval. This section does not enhance or diminish the authority of
a county to enact ordinances applicable to the Town of Butner and its extraterritorial jurisdiction.
Butner.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, no portion of the lands owned by
the State as of September 1, 2007, which are located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction or the
incorporated limits of the Town of Butner shall be subject to any of the powers granted to the
Town of Butner pursuant to Chapter 160D of the General Statutes except as to property no longer
owned by the State. If any portion of such property owned by the State of North Carolina as of
September 1, 2007, is no longer owned by the State, the Town of Butner may exercise all legal
authority granted to the Town pursuant to the terms of its charter or by Chapter 160D of the
General Statutes and may do so by ordinances adopted prior to the actual date of transfer. Before
the State shall dispose of any property inside the incorporated limits of the Town of Butner or
any of that property currently under the control of the North Carolina Department of Health and
Human Services or the North Carolina Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services within
the extraterritorial jurisdiction jurisdiction, as that term is defined in G.S. 122C-3(13e), of the
Town of Butner, southeast of Old Highway 75, northeast of Central Avenue, southwest of 33rd
Street, and northwest of "G" Street, by sale or lease for any use not directly associated with a
State function, the Town of Butner shall first be given the right of first refusal to purchase said
property at fair market value as determined by the average of the value of said property as
determined by a qualified appraiser selected by the Secretary and a qualified appraiser selected
by the Town of Butner."
SECTION 17. G.S. 130A-317 reads as rewritten:
Page 6 House Bill 1009-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 130A-317. Department to provide advice; submission and approval of public water
system plans.
…
(d) Municipalities, counties, local boards or commissions, water and sewer authorities,
or groups of municipalities and counties may establish and administer within their utility service
areas their own approval program in lieu of State approval of water system plans required in
subsection (c) of this section for construction or alteration of the distribution system of a proposed
or existing public water system, subject to the prior certification of the Department. For purposes
of this subsection, the service area of a municipality shall include only that area within the
corporate limits of the municipality and that area outside a municipality in its extraterritorial
jurisdiction where water service is already being provided to the permit applicant by the
municipality or connection to the municipal water system is immediately available to the
applicant; the service areas of counties and the other entities or groups shall include only those
areas where water service is already being provided to the applicant by the permitting authority
or connection to the permitting authority's system is immediately available. . For purposes of this
subsection, the term "extraterritorial jurisdiction" means the boundaries of the area over which a
municipality was exercising extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article 19 of Chapter
160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, prior to the
municipality's relinquishment of jurisdiction over the area on or before January 1, 2026.No later
than the 180th day after the receipt of an approval program and statement submitted by any local
government, commission, authority, or board, the Department shall certify any local program
that meets all of the following conditions:
… ."
SECTION 18. G.S. 136-55.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-55.1. Notice of abandonment.
…
(b) In keeping with its overall zoning scheme and long-range plans regarding the
extraterritorial jurisdiction area, Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 160D of the General
Statutes or any other provision of law, a municipality may keep open and assume responsibility
for maintenance of a road within one mile of its corporate limits once it is abandoned from the
State highway system."
SECTION 19. G.S. 136-63 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-63. Change or abandonment of roads.
…
(b) In keeping with its overall zoning scheme and long-range plans regarding the
extraterritorial jurisdiction area, Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 160D of the General
Statutes or any other provision of law, a municipality may keep open and assume responsibility
for maintenance of a road within one mile of its corporate limits once it is abandoned from the
State highway system."
SECTION 20. G.S. 136-66.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-66.3. Local government participation in improvements to the State transportation
system.
(a) Municipal Participation Authorized. – A municipality may, but is not required to,
participate in the right-of-way and construction cost of a State transportation improvement
approved by the Board of Transportation under G.S. 143B-350(f)(4) that is located in the
municipality or its extraterritorial jurisdiction. municipality.
… ."
SECTION 21. G.S. 143-138 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-138. North Carolina State Building Code.
…
House Bill 1009-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) Effect upon Local Codes. – Except as otherwise provided in this section, the North
Carolina State Building Code shall apply throughout the State, from the time of its adoption.
Approved rules shall become effective in accordance with G.S. 150B-21.3. However, any
political subdivision of the State may adopt a fire prevention code and floodplain management
regulations within its jurisdiction. Provided a political subdivision shall not adopt local fire
prevention code provisions which apply to dwellings subject to the North Carolina Residential
Code which are not prescriptively required by the North Carolina Residential Code. The
territorial jurisdiction of any municipality or county for this purpose, unless otherwise specified
by the General Assembly, shall be as follows: Municipal jurisdiction shall include all areas within
the corporate limits of the municipality and extraterritorial jurisdiction areas established as
provided in G.S. 160D-202 or a local act; municipality; county jurisdiction shall include all other
areas of the county. No such code or regulations, other than floodplain management regulations
and those permitted by G.S. 160D-1128, shall be effective until they have been officially
approved by the Building Code Council as providing adequate minimum standards to preserve
and protect health and safety, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) above. Local
floodplain regulations may regulate all types and uses of buildings or structures located in flood
hazard areas identified by local, State, and federal agencies, and include provisions governing
substantial improvements, substantial damage, cumulative substantial improvements, lowest
floor elevation, protection of mechanical and electrical systems, foundation construction,
anchorage, acceptable flood resistant materials, and other measures the political subdivision
deems necessary considering the characteristics of its flood hazards and vulnerability. In the
absence of approval by the Building Code Council, or in the event that approval is withdrawn,
local fire prevention codes and regulations shall have no force and effect. Provided any local
regulations approved by the local governing body which are found by the Council to be more
stringent than the adopted statewide fire prevention code and which are found to regulate only
activities and conditions in buildings, structures, and premises that pose dangers of fire, explosion
or related hazards, and are not matters in conflict with the State Building Code, may be approved.
Local governments may enforce the fire prevention code of the State Building Code using civil
remedies authorized under G.S. 143-139, 153A-123, and 160A-175. If the Commissioner of
Insurance or other State official with responsibility for enforcement of the Code institutes a civil
action pursuant to G.S. 143-139, a local government may not institute a civil action under
G.S. 143-139, 153A-123, or 160A-175 based upon the same violation. Appeals from the
assessment or imposition of such civil remedies shall be as provided in G.S. 160D-1127.
A local government may not adopt any ordinance in conflict with the exemption provided by
subsection (c1) of this section. No local ordinance or regulation shall be construed to limit the
exemption provided by subsection (c1) of this section.
… ."
SECTION 22. G.S. 143-215.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-215.1. Control of sources of water pollution; permits required.
…
(f) Local Permit Programs for Sewer Extension and Reclaimed Water Utilization. –
Municipalities, counties, local boards or commissions, water and sewer authorities, or groups of
municipalities and counties may establish and administer within their utility service areas their
own general permit programs in lieu of State permit required in G.S. 143-215.1(a)(2), (3), and
(8) above, for construction, operation, alteration, extension, change of proposed or existing sewer
system, subject to the prior certification of the Commission. For purposes of this subsection, the
service area of a municipality shall include only that area within the corporate limits of the
municipality and that area outside a municipality in its extraterritorial jurisdiction where sewer
service or a reclaimed water utilization system is already being provided by the municipality to
the permit applicant or connection to the municipal sewer system or a reclaimed water utilization
system is immediately available to the applicant; the service areas of counties and the other
Page 8 House Bill 1009-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
entities or groups shall include only those areas where sewer service or a reclaimed water
utilization system is already being provided to the applicant by the permitting authority or
connection to the permitting authority's system is immediately available. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "extraterritorial jurisdiction" means the boundaries of the area over which a
municipality was exercising extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article 19 of Chapter
160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D of the General Statutes, prior to the
municipality's relinquishment of jurisdiction over the area on or before January 1, 2026. No later
than the 180th day after the receipt of a program and statement submitted by any local
government, commission, authority, or board the Commission shall certify any local program
that does all of the following:
… ."
SECTION 23. G.S. 153A-317.14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-317.14. Extension of economic development and training districts.
(a) Standards. – A board of commissioners may by resolution annex territory to an
economic development and training district upon finding that:
…
(6) If any of the area proposed to be annexed to the district is wholly or partially
within the extraterritorial jurisdiction of a municipality, then it shall be
necessary to first obtain the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of
the governing body of the municipality before the area can be annexed.
… ."
SECTION 24. G.S. 160A-58.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-58.4. Extraterritorial powers.
Satellite corporate limits shall not be considered a part of the city's corporate limits for the
purposes of extraterritorial land-use regulation pursuant to G.S. 160D-202 or purpose of
abatement of public health nuisances pursuant to G.S. 160A-193. However, a city's power to
regulate land use pursuant to Chapter 160D of the General Statutes or to abate public health
nuisances pursuant to G.S. 160A-193, G.S. 160A-193 shall be the same within satellite corporate
limits as within its primary corporate limits."
SECTION 25. G.S. 160A-176.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-176.1. Ordinances effective in Atlantic Ocean.
(a) A city may adopt ordinances to regulate and control swimming, surfing and littering
in the Atlantic Ocean adjacent to that portion of the city within its boundaries or within its
extraterritorial jurisdiction; boundaries; provided, however, nothing contained herein shall be
construed to permit any city to prohibit altogether swimming and surfing or to make these
activities unlawful.
… ."
SECTION 26. G.S. 160A-176.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-176.2. Ordinances effective in Atlantic Ocean.
(a) A city may adopt ordinances to regulate and control swimming, personal watercraft
operation, surfing and littering in the Atlantic Ocean and other waterways adjacent to that portion
of the city within its boundaries or within its extraterritorial jurisdiction; boundaries; provided,
however, nothing contained herein shall be construed to permit any city to prohibit altogether
swimming or surfing or to make these activities unlawful.
… ."
SECTION 27. G.S. 160A-296 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-296. Establishment and control of streets; center and edge lines.
…
(a1) A city with a population of 250,000 or over according to the most recent decennial
federal census may also exercise the power granted by subdivision (a)(3) of this section within
its extraterritorial planning jurisdiction. Before a city makes improvements under this subsection,
House Bill 1009-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
it shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of Transportation to
provide for maintenance.
… ."
SECTION 28. G.S. 160A-299 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-299. Procedure for permanently closing streets and alleys.
…
(d) This section shall apply to any street or public alley within a city or its extraterritorial
jurisdiction that has been irrevocably dedicated to the public, without regard to whether it has
actually been opened. This section also applies to unopened streets or public alleys that are shown
on plats but that have not been accepted or maintained by the city, provided that this section shall
not abrogate the rights of a dedicator, or those claiming under a dedicator, pursuant to
G.S. 136-96.
… ."
SECTION 29. G.S. 160A-340.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 160A-340.2. Exemptions.
…
(c) The provisions of G.S. 160A-340.1, 160A-340.3, 160A-340.4, 160A-340.5, and
160A-340.6 do not apply to a city or joint agency providing communications service as of
January 1, 2011, provided the city or joint agency limits the provision of communications service
to any one or more of the following:
…
(3) The following service areas:
a. For the joint agency operated by the cities of Davidson and
Mooresville, the service area is the combined areas of the city of
Cornelius; the town of Troutman; the town of Huntersville; the
unincorporated areas of Mecklenburg County north of a line beginning
at Highway 16 along the west boundary of the county, extending
eastward along Highway 16, continuing east along Interstate 485, and
continuing eastward to the eastern boundary of the county along
Eastfield Road; and the unincorporated areas of Iredell County south
of Interstate 40, excluding the City of Statesville and the
extraterritorial jurisdiction of the City of Statesville. For purposes of
this sub-subdivision, the term "extraterritorial jurisdiction" means the
boundaries of the area over which the City of Statesville was
exercising extraterritorial planning jurisdiction under Article 19 of
Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or its successor Chapter 160D
of the General Statutes, prior to the City's relinquishment of
jurisdiction over the area on or before January 1, 2026.
…."

PART III. LAW ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 30. This act shall have no effect on the extraterritorial jurisdiction of law
enforcement officers as authorized in Chapter 77 of the General Statutes, G.S. 15A-402, 20-38.2,
160A-286, or any other local act or provision of general law.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 31. The headings to the parts of this act are a convenience to the reader
and are for reference only. The headings do not expand, limit, or define the text of this act.
SECTION 32. This act becomes effective January 1, 2026.
Page 10 House Bill 1009-First Edition